src-phonetics-text2tts-sme.xfscript.md
retroflex plosive, voiceless		t`  ʈ	    0288, 648 (` = ASCII 096)
retroflex plosive, voiced		d`	ɖ		0256, 598
labiodental nasal				F 	ɱ		0271, 625
retroflex nasal					n` 	ɳ		0273, 627
palatal nasal					J 	ɲ		0272, 626
velar nasal						N 	ŋ		014B, 331
uvular nasal						N\	ɴ		0274, 628

bilabial trill					B\ 	ʙ		0299, 665
uvular trill						R\ 	ʀ		0280, 640
alveolar tap						4	ɾ		027E, 638
retroflex flap					r` 	ɽ		027D, 637
bilabial fricative, voiceless	p\ 	ɸ		0278, 632
bilabial fricative, voiced		B 	β		03B2, 946
dental fricative, voiceless		T 	θ		03B8, 952
dental fricative, voiced			D 	ð		00F0, 240
postalveolar fricative, voiceless	S	ʃ		0283, 643
postalveolar fricative, voiced		Z 	ʒ		0292, 658
retroflex fricative, voiceless		s` 	ʂ		0282, 642
retroflex fricative, voiced			z` 	ʐ		0290, 656
palatal fricative, voiceless			C 	ç		00E7, 231
palatal fricative, voiced			j\ 	ʝ		029D, 669
velar fricative, voiced	        	G 	ɣ		0263, 611
uvular fricative, voiceless			X	χ		03C7, 967
uvular fricative, voiced				R 	ʁ		0281, 641
pharyngeal fricative, voiceless		X\ 	ħ		0127, 295
pharyngeal fricative, voiced			?\ 	ʕ		0295, 661
glottal fricative, voiced			h\	ɦ		0266, 614

alveolar lateral fricative, vl.		K 
alveolar lateral fricative, vd.		K\

labiodental approximant				P (or v\) 
alveolar approximant					r\ 
retroflex approximant				r\` 
velar approximant					M\

retroflex lateral approximant		l` 
palatal lateral approximant			L 
velar lateral approximant			L\
Clicks

bilabial								O\	(O = capital letter) 
dental								|\
(post)alveolar						!\ 
palatoalveolar						=\ 
alveolar lateral						|\|\
Ejectives, implosives

ejective								_>	e.g. ejective p		p_>
implosive							_<	e.g. implosive b	b_<
Vowels

close back unrounded					M
close central unrounded 				1 
close central rounded				} 
lax i								I 
lax y								Y 
lax u								U

close-mid front rounded				2 
close-mid central unrounded			@\ 
close-mid central rounded			8 
close-mid back unrounded				7

schwa								@

open-mid front unrounded				E 
open-mid front rounded				9
open-mid central unrounded			3 
open-mid central rounded				3\ 
open-mid back unrounded				V 
open-mid back rounded				O

ash (ae digraph)						{ 
open schwa (turned a)				6

open front rounded					& 
open back unrounded	        		A 
open back rounded					Q
Other symbols

voiceless labial-velar fricative		W 
voiced labial-palatal approx.		H 
voiceless epiglottal fricative		H\ 
voiced epiglottal fricative			<\ 
epiglottal plosive					>\

alveolo-palatal fricative, vl. 		s\ 
alveolo-palatal fricative, voiced	z\ 
alveolar lateral flap				l\ 
simultaneous S and x					x\ 
tie bar								_
Suprasegmentals

primary stress						" 
secondary stress						% 
long									: 
half-long							:\ 
extra-short							_X 
linking mark							-\
Tones and word accents

level extra high						_T 
level high							_H
level mid							_M 
level low							_L 
level extra low						_B
downstep								! 
upstep								^	(caret, circumflex)

contour, rising						 
contour, falling						_F 
contour, high rising					_H_T 
contour, low rising					_B_L 

contour, rising-falling				_R_F 
(NB Instead of being written as diacritics with _, all prosodic marks can alternatively be placed in a separate tier, set off by < >, as recommended for the next two symbols.)
global rise				<R> 
global fall				<F>
Diacritics

voiceless				_0	(0 = figure), e.g. n_0
voiced					_v 
aspirated				_h 
more rounded				_O	(O = letter) 
less rounded				_c 
advanced					_+
retracted				_-
centralized				_" 
syllabic					=	(or _=) e.g. n= (or n_=) 
non-syllabic				_^ 
rhoticity				`

breathy voiced			_t 
creaky voiced			_k
linguolabial				_N 
labialized				_w 
palatalized				'	(or _j) e.g. t' (or t_j) 
velarized				_G 
pharyngealized			_?\

dental					_d 
apical					_a 
laminal					_m
nasalized				~	(or _~) e.g. A~ (or A_~) 
nasal release			_n
lateral release			_l 
no audible release		_}

velarized or pharyngealized		_e 
velarized l, alternatively		5 
raised							_r 
lowered							_o 
advanced tongue root				_A 
retracted tongue root			_q
* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/phonetics/text2tts-sme.xfscript](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-sme/blob/main/../src/phonetics/text2tts-sme.xfscript)</small>
